src/fastspell_dictionaries/szl.aff
FLAG num
SFX 491 N 1
SFX 491 eć ałaby .
SFX 492 N 1
SFX 492 eć ałach .
SFX 493 N 1
SFX 493 eć ałaś .
SFX 494 N 1
SFX 494 eć ała .
SFX 495 N 1
SFX 495 eć ałoby .
SFX 496 N 1
SFX 496 eć ało .
SFX 497 N 1
SFX 497 eć ałybymy .
SFX 498 N 1
SFX 498 eć ałybyście .
SFX 499 N 1
SFX 499 eć ałyby .
SFX 500 N 1
SFX 500 eć ałychmy .
SFX 501 N 1
SFX 501 eć ałymy .
SFX 502 N 1
SFX 502 eć ałyście .
SFX 503 N 1
SFX 503 eć ały .
SFX 504 N 1
SFX 504 eć ano .
SFX 505 N 1
SFX 505 eć a .
SFX 506 N 1
SFX 506 eć cie .
SFX 507 N 1
SFX 507 eć my .
SFX 508 N 1
SFX 508 eć ołbych .
SFX 509 N 1
SFX 509 eć ołbyś .
SFX 510 N 1
SFX 510 eć ołby .
SFX 511 N 1
SFX 511 eć ołch .
SFX 512 N 1
SFX 512 eć ołech .
SFX 513 N 1
SFX 513 eć ołś .
SFX 514 N 1
SFX 514 eć oł .
SFX 515 N 1
SFX 515 eć ōm .
SFX 516 N 1
SFX 516 eć ōncego .
SFX 517 N 1
SFX 517 eć ōnce .
SFX 518 N 1
SFX 518 eć ōnco .
SFX 519 N 1
SFX 519 eć ōncōm .
SFX 520 N 1
SFX 520 eć ōnc .
SFX 521 N 1
SFX 521 eć ōncych .
SFX 522 N 1
SFX 522 eć ōncyj .
SFX 523 N 1
SFX 523 eć ōncymi .
SFX 524 N 1
SFX 524 eć ōncymu .
SFX 525 N 1
SFX 525 eć ōncym .
SFX 526 N 1
SFX 526 eć ōncy .
SFX 527 N 1
SFX 527 eć 0 .
SFX 528 N 1
SFX 528 eć ycie .
SFX 529 N 1
SFX 529 eć ymy .
SFX 530 N 1
SFX 530 eć yniach .
SFX 531 N 1
SFX 531 eć yniami .
SFX 532 N 1
SFX 532 eć ynia .
SFX 533 N 1
SFX 533 eć ynie .
SFX 534 N 1
SFX 534 eć ynio .
SFX 535 N 1
SFX 535 eć yniōm .
SFX 536 N 1
SFX 536 eć yniu .
SFX 537 N 1
SFX 537 eć yniym .
SFX 538 N 1
SFX 538 eć yń .
SFX 539 N 1
SFX 539 eć ysz .
SFX 540 N 1
SFX 540 eć y .
SFX 541 N 1
SFX 541 ć jcie .
SFX 542 N 1
SFX 542 ć jmy .
SFX 543 N 1
SFX 543 ć j .
SFX 544 N 1
SFX 544 ń niach .
SFX 545 N 1
SFX 545 ń niami .
SFX 546 N 1
SFX 546 ń nia .
SFX 547 N 1
SFX 547 ń nie .
SFX 548 N 1
SFX 548 ń niowi .
SFX 549 N 1
SFX 549 ń niōm .
SFX 550 N 1
SFX 550 ń niu .
SFX 551 N 1
SFX 551 ń ni .
SFX 552 N 1
SFX 552 ń niym .
SFX 553 N 1
SFX 553 ty ci .
SFX 554 N 1
SFX 554 ć cia .
SFX 555 N 1
SFX 555 ć cio .
SFX 556 N 1
SFX 556 ć ciu .
SFX 557 N 1
SFX 557 ć ciym .
SFX 558 N 1
SFX 558 ć ja .
SFX 559 N 1
SFX 559 ć jecie .
SFX 560 N 1
SFX 560 ć jesz .
SFX 561 N 1
SFX 561 ć je .
SFX 562 N 1
SFX 562 ć jymy .
SFX 563 N 1
SFX 563 ć tego .
SFX 564 N 1
SFX 564 ć te .
SFX 565 N 1
SFX 565 ć to .
SFX 566 N 1
SFX 566 ć tōm .
SFX 567 N 1
SFX 567 ć tych .
SFX 568 N 1
SFX 568 ć tyj .
SFX 569 N 1
SFX 569 ć tymi .
SFX 570 N 1
SFX 570 ć tymu .
SFX 571 N 1
SFX 571 ć tym .
SFX 572 N 1
SFX 572 ć ty .
SFX 573 N 1
SFX 573 ro er .
SFX 574 N 1
SFX 574 o ze .
SFX 575 N 1
SFX 575 o-Bioło a-Biołyj .
SFX 576 N 1
SFX 576 o-Bioło u-Biołyj .
SFX 577 N 1
SFX 577 o-Bioło ym-Biołōm .
SFX 578 N 1
SFX 578 ko ek .
SFX 579 N 1
SFX 579 ćki ciyńcy .
SFX 580 N 1
SFX 580 ćki ciyńke .
SFX 581 N 1
SFX 581 ćki ciyńkich .
SFX 582 N 1
SFX 582 ćki ciyńkigo .
SFX 583 N 1
SFX 583 ćki ciyńkij .
SFX 584 N 1
SFX 584 ćki ciyńkimi .
SFX 585 N 1
SFX 585 ćki ciyńkimu .
SFX 586 N 1
SFX 586 ćki ciyńkim .
SFX 587 N 1
SFX 587 ćki ciyńki .
SFX 588 N 1
SFX 588 ćki ciyńko .
SFX 589 N 1
SFX 589 ćki ciyńkōm .
SFX 590 N 1
SFX 590 ćki siyńcy .
SFX 591 N 1
SFX 591 ćki siyńke .
SFX 592 N 1
SFX 592 ćki siyńkich .
SFX 593 N 1
SFX 593 ćki siyńkigo .
SFX 594 N 1
SFX 594 ćki siyńkij .
SFX 595 N 1
SFX 595 ćki siyńkimi .
SFX 596 N 1
SFX 596 ćki siyńkimu .
SFX 597 N 1
SFX 597 ćki siyńkim .
SFX 598 N 1
SFX 598 ćki siyńki .
SFX 599 N 1
SFX 599 ćki siyńko .
SFX 600 N 1
SFX 600 ćki siyńkōm .
SFX 601 N 1
SFX 601 ćki ścy .
SFX 602 N 1
SFX 602 ćki śke .
SFX 603 N 1
SFX 603 ćki śkich .
SFX 604 N 1
SFX 604 ćki śkigo .
SFX 605 N 1
SFX 605 ćki śkij .
SFX 606 N 1
SFX 606 ćki śkimi .
SFX 607 N 1
SFX 607 ćki śkimu .
SFX 608 N 1
SFX 608 ćki śkim .
SFX 609 N 1
SFX 609 ćki śki .
SFX 610 N 1
SFX 610 ćki śko .
SFX 611 N 1
SFX 611 ćki śkōm .
SFX 612 N 1
SFX 612 oło elij .
SFX 613 Y 1
SFX 613 oło elij .
PFX 613 Y 1
PFX 613 0 noj .
SFX 614 N 1
SFX 614 ś siach .
SFX 615 N 1
SFX 615 ś siami .
SFX 616 N 1
SFX 616 ś siōm .
SFX 617 N 1
SFX 617 ś si .
SFX 618 N 1
SFX 618 ły li .
SFX 619 N 1
SFX 619 ły lsi .
SFX 620 N 1
SFX 620 ły lszego .
SFX 621 N 1
SFX 621 ły lsze .
SFX 622 N 1
SFX 622 ły lszo .
SFX 623 N 1
SFX 623 ły lszōm .
SFX 624 N 1
SFX 624 ły lszych .
SFX 625 N 1
SFX 625 ły lszyj .
SFX 626 N 1
SFX 626 ły lszymi .
SFX 627 N 1
SFX 627 ły lszymu .
SFX 628 N 1
SFX 628 ły lszym .
SFX 629 N 1
SFX 629 ły lszy .
SFX 630 Y 1
SFX 630 ły lsi .
PFX 630 Y 1
PFX 630 0 noj .
SFX 631 Y 1
SFX 631 ły lszego .
PFX 631 Y 1
PFX 631 0 noj .
SFX 632 Y 1
SFX 632 ły lsze .
PFX 632 Y 1
PFX 632 0 noj .
SFX 633 Y 1
SFX 633 ły lszo .
PFX 633 Y 1
PFX 633 0 noj .
SFX 634 Y 1
SFX 634 ły lszōm .
PFX 634 Y 1
PFX 634 0 noj .
SFX 635 Y 1
SFX 635 ły lszych .
PFX 635 Y 1
PFX 635 0 noj .
SFX 636 Y 1
SFX 636 ły lszyj .
PFX 636 Y 1
PFX 636 0 noj .
SFX 637 Y 1
SFX 637 ły lszymi .
PFX 637 Y 1
PFX 637 0 noj .
SFX 638 Y 1
SFX 638 ły lszymu .
PFX 638 Y 1
PFX 638 0 noj .
SFX 639 Y 1
SFX 639 ły lszym .
PFX 639 Y 1
PFX 639 0 noj .
SFX 640 Y 1
SFX 640 ły lszy .
PFX 640 Y 1
PFX 640 0 noj .
SFX 641 N 1
SFX 641 a ew .
SFX 642 N 1
SFX 642 a wach .
SFX 643 N 1
SFX 643 a wami .
SFX 644 N 1
SFX 644 a wa .
SFX 645 N 1
SFX 645 a wie .
SFX 646 N 1
SFX 646 a wo .
SFX 647 N 1
SFX 647 a wōm .
SFX 648 N 1
SFX 648 a wy .
SFX 649 N 1
SFX 649 wa ew .
SFX 650 N 1
SFX 650 c galibymy .
SFX 651 N 1
SFX 651 c galibyście .
SFX 652 N 1
SFX 652 c galiby .
SFX 653 N 1
SFX 653 c galichmy .
SFX 654 N 1
SFX 654 c galimy .
SFX 655 N 1
SFX 655 c galiście .
SFX 656 N 1
SFX 656 c gali .
SFX 657 N 1
SFX 657 c gałabych .
SFX 658 N 1
SFX 658 c gałabyś .
SFX 659 N 1
SFX 659 c gałaby .
SFX 660 N 1
SFX 660 c gałach .
SFX 661 N 1
SFX 661 c gałaś .
SFX 662 N 1
SFX 662 c gała .
SFX 663 N 1
SFX 663 c gałoby .
SFX 664 N 1
SFX 664 c gało .
SFX 665 N 1
SFX 665 c gałybymy .
SFX 666 N 1
SFX 666 c gałybyście .
SFX 667 N 1
SFX 667 c gałyby .
SFX 668 N 1
SFX 668 c gałychmy .
SFX 669 N 1
SFX 669 c gałymy .
SFX 670 N 1
SFX 670 c gałyście .
SFX 671 N 1
SFX 671 c gały .
SFX 672 N 1
SFX 672 c ganego .
SFX 673 N 1
SFX 673 c gane .
SFX 674 N 1
SFX 674 c ganiach .
SFX 675 N 1
SFX 675 c ganiami .
SFX 676 N 1
SFX 676 c gania .
SFX 677 N 1
SFX 677 c ganie .
SFX 678 N 1
SFX 678 c ganio .
SFX 679 N 1
SFX 679 c ganiōm .
SFX 680 N 1
SFX 680 c ganiu .
SFX 681 N 1
SFX 681 c gani .
SFX 682 N 1
SFX 682 c ganiym .
SFX 683 N 1
SFX 683 c gano .
SFX 684 N 1
SFX 684 c ganōm .
SFX 685 N 1
SFX 685 c ganych .
SFX 686 N 1
SFX 686 c ganyj .
SFX 687 N 1
SFX 687 c ganymi .
SFX 688 N 1
SFX 688 c ganymu .
SFX 689 N 1
SFX 689 c ganym .
SFX 690 N 1
SFX 690 c gany .
SFX 691 N 1
SFX 691 c gań .
SFX 692 N 1
SFX 692 c gna .
SFX 693 N 1
SFX 693 c gniecie .
SFX 694 N 1
SFX 694 c gniesz .
SFX 695 N 1
SFX 695 c gnie .
SFX 696 N 1
SFX 696 c gnijcie .
SFX 697 N 1
SFX 697 c gnijmy .
SFX 698 N 1
SFX 698 c gnij .
SFX 699 N 1
SFX 699 c gnōm .
SFX 700 N 1
SFX 700 c gnōncego .
SFX 701 N 1
SFX 701 c gnōnce .
SFX 702 N 1
SFX 702 c gnōnco .
SFX 703 N 1
SFX 703 c gnōncōm .
SFX 704 N 1
SFX 704 c gnōnc .
SFX 705 N 1
SFX 705 c gnōncych .
SFX 706 N 1
SFX 706 c gnōncyj .
SFX 707 N 1
SFX 707 c gnōncymi .
SFX 708 N 1
SFX 708 c gnōncymu .
SFX 709 N 1
SFX 709 c gnōncym .
SFX 710 N 1
SFX 710 c gnōncy .
SFX 711 N 1
SFX 711 c gnymy .
SFX 712 N 1
SFX 712 c gołbych .
SFX 713 N 1
SFX 713 c gołbyś .
SFX 714 N 1
SFX 714 c gołby .
SFX 715 N 1
SFX 715 c gołch .
SFX 716 N 1
SFX 716 c gołech .
SFX 717 N 1
SFX 717 c gołś .
SFX 718 N 1
SFX 718 c goł .
SFX 719 N 1
SFX 719 y zi .
SFX 720 N 1
SFX 720 ski żsi .
SFX 721 N 1
SFX 721 ski ższego .
SFX 722 N 1
SFX 722 ski ższe .
SFX 723 N 1
SFX 723 ski ższo .
SFX 724 N 1
SFX 724 ski ższōm .
SFX 725 N 1
SFX 725 ski ższych .
SFX 726 N 1
SFX 726 ski ższyj .
SFX 727 N 1
SFX 727 ski ższymi .
SFX 728 N 1
SFX 728 ski ższymu .
SFX 729 N 1
SFX 729 ski ższym .
SFX 730 N 1
SFX 730 ski ższy .
SFX 731 Y 1
SFX 731 ski żsi .
PFX 731 Y 1
PFX 731 0 noj .
SFX 732 Y 1
SFX 732 ski ższego .
PFX 732 Y 1
PFX 732 0 noj .
SFX 733 Y 1
SFX 733 ski ższe .
PFX 733 Y 1
PFX 733 0 noj .
SFX 734 Y 1
SFX 734 ski ższo .
PFX 734 Y 1
PFX 734 0 noj .
SFX 735 Y 1
SFX 735 ski ższōm .
PFX 735 Y 1
PFX 735 0 noj .
