src/fastspell_dictionaries/szl.dic
Bielsko-Bioło/575,576,577
bioło/612,613
kamyń/544,545,546,547,548,549,550,551,552
patrzeć/489,490,491,492,493,494,495,496,497,498,499,500,501,502,503,1101,1102,1103,504,1104,1105,1106,1107,1108,1109,1110,505,506,12,13,14,15,16,17,18,846,847,848,507,508,509,510,511,512,513,514,515,516,517,518,519,520,521,522,523,524,525,526,527,529,530,531,532,533,534,535,536,537,538
piōro/92,93,99,96,100,361,101,574
rozumieć/489,490,491,492,493,494,495,496,497,498,499,500,501,502,503,504,505,506,12,13,14,15,16,17,18,507,508,509,510,511,512,513,514,515,516,517,518,519,520,521,522,523,524,525,526,944,945,849,946,947,948,949,950,951,952,527,528,529,530,531,532,533,534,535,536,953,537,538,539,540
strzybro/573,92,93,99,96,100,101,574
szerszyń/544,545,546,547,548,549,550,551,552
sztworty/553,115,116,118,119,83,85,86,87,88
trzeć/489,490,491,492,493,494,495,496,497,498,499,500,501,502,503,1101,1102,1103,504,1104,1105,1106,1107,1108,1109,1110,505,506,12,13,14,15,16,17,18,846,847,848,507,508,509,510,511,512,513,514,515,516,517,518,519,520,521,522,523,524,525,526,527,529,530,531,532,533,534,535,536,537,538
uciyrpieć/489,490,491,492,493,494,495,496,497,498,499,500,501,502,503,1101,1102,1103,504,1104,1105,1106,1107,1108,1109,1110,505,506,12,13,14,15,16,17,18,846,847,848,507,508,509,510,511,512,513,514,515,527,529,530,531,532,533,534,535,536,537,538
umieć/489,490,491,492,493,494,495,496,497,498,499,500,501,502,503,504,505,12,13,14,15,16,17,18,508,509,510,511,512,513,514,515,516,517,518,519,520,521,522,523,524,525,526,944,945,849,946,947,948,949,950,951,952,528,1111,1112,1113,529,530,531,532,533,534,535,536,953,537,538,539,540
upōmnieć/1097,489,490,491,492,493,494,495,496,497,498,499,500,501,502,503,1101,1102,504,1104,1105,1106,1107,1108,1109,1110,506,12,13,14,15,16,17,18,986,987,988,508,509,510,511,512,513,514,989,527,530,531,532,533,534,535,536,953,537,538,1114,1126
uzależnić/452,279,541,542,543,280,281,282,283,284,285,286,453,465,466,467,468,469,470,471,472,473,474,287,288,289,290,291,292,293,294,295,296,297,298,299,300,301,302,303,304,305,306,307,308,309,310,475,476,477,478,479,480,481,482,483,484,485
wrzeszczeć/489,490,491,492,493,494,495,496,497,498,499,500,501,502,503,504,505,506,12,13,14,15,16,17,18,507,508,509,510,511,512,513,514,515,516,517,518,519,520,521,522,523,524,525,526,527,528,529,530,531,532,533,534,535,536,537,538,539,540
zajrzeć/489,490,491,492,493,494,495,496,497,498,499,500,501,502,503,504,505,12,13,14,15,16,17,18,846,1878,1879,1880,1881,847,848,508,509,510,511,512,513,514,515,944,945,849,946,947,948,949,950,951,952,530,531,532,533,534,535,536,953,537,538
zepsuć/111,112,554,279,555,113,556,114,557,558,541,559,560,561,542,410,543,562,12,13,14,15,16,17,18,19,20,21,22,23,24,793,794,795,796,797,25,26,798,799,27,28,29,30,31,32,33,563,564,565,566,567,568,569,570,571,572
zmyć/365,366,367,368,369,370,371,111,112,554,279,555,113,556,114,557,558,541,559,560,561,542,410,543,562,12,13,14,15,16,17,18,19,20,21,22,23,24,25,26,27,28,29,30,31,32,33,563,564,565,566,567,568,569,570,571,572
ôbmyśleć/489,490,491,492,493,494,495,496,497,498,499,500,501,502,503,1101,1102,1103,504,1104,1105,1106,1107,1108,1109,1110,505,506,12,13,14,15,16,17,18,846,847,848,507,508,509,510,511,512,513,514,515,527,529,530,531,532,533,534,535,536,537,538
ôbsuć/111,112,554,279,555,113,556,114,557,558,541,559,560,561,542,410,543,562,12,13,14,15,16,17,18,19,20,21,22,23,24,793,794,795,796,797,25,26,798,799,27,28,29,30,31,32,33,563,564,565,566,567,568,569,570,571,572
ôdkrziczeć/489,490,491,492,493,494,495,496,497,498,499,500,501,502,503,1101,1102,1103,504,1104,1105,1106,1107,1108,1109,1110,505,506,12,13,14,15,16,17,18,507,508,509,510,511,512,513,514,515,527,528,529,530,531,532,533,534,535,536,537,538,539,540
ôżreć/4179,4180,4181,4182,4183,4184,4185,4186,4187,4188,4189,4190,4191,4192,4193,4194,4195,4196,4197,4198,4199,4200,4201,4202,4203,4204,4205,4206,4207,4208,4209,4210,4211,4212,4213,4214,4215,4216,4217,4218,4219,4220,4221,4222,4223,4224,4225,4226,505,279,287,288,1878,1879,1880,515,529
